Hawaii, session 2025, SB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that municipal water agencies have asked residents to conserve water due to severe drought conditions, climate change, and the Oahu-based public health crisis and environmental disaster caused by fuel released from the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility. However, despite these calls for conservation, the legislature finds that relevant agencies need additional means to restrict certain nonessential uses of water, including water for purely recreational or ornamental purposes.  These restrictions are required to ensure that water, the State's most precious and finite resource, remains available to support human health and safety and to ensure the maintenance of the State's economic future. The purpose of this Act is to prohibit a person, which is defined for purposes of chapter 174C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to include firms, associations, organizations, partnerships, business trusts, corporations, companies, and government agencies, from using one million gallons or more of potable water for recreational or ornamental purposes. SECTION 2.  Chapter 174C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§174C- Recreational or ornamental uses; restrictions on use.  (a)  No person shall use, and no person issued a permit pursuant to this chapter shall permit a person to use, one million or more gallons of potable water per year for recreational or ornamental uses. (b)  This section shall not apply to recreational or ornamental uses of water that solely use recycled water. (c)  As used in this section: "Recreational or ornamental use" means water that is used solely for recreational or ornamental purposes, including but not limited to: (1)  The filling or refilling of swimming pools, wading pools, wave pools, or spas; (2)  Decorative ponds or lakes, fountains, or artificial lakes; and (3)  Any other use of water determined by the commission to be a recreational or ornamental use. "Recycled water" means treated wastewater that by design is intended or used for a beneficial purpose." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________